Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1114
Open discharge system, defined.

Open discharge system shall mean a system in which the water is pumped or diverted directly into a ditch or canal in such a manner that the force of gravity at the point of discharge into the ditch or canal cannot cause water to flow back to the point from which the water was pumped or diverted.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 14.